California statutes. Public Contract Code
  ARTICLE 113. Antelope Valley-East Kern Water Agency [21480. - 21482.]

21480.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Antelope Valley-East Kern Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 2146 of the Statutes of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21481.

The Antelope Valley-East Kern Water Agency shall have the power to join with one or more public agencies, private corporations, or other persons for the purpose of carrying out any of the powers of the agency, and for that purpose to contract with such other public agencies or private corporations or persons for the purpose of financing such acquisitions, constructions, and operations. Such contracts may provide for contributions to be made by each party thereto and for the division and apportionment of the expenses of such acquisitions and operations, and the division and apportionment of the benefits, the services and products therefrom, and may provide for any agency to effect such acquisitions and to carry on such operations, and shall provide in the powers and methods of procedure for such agency the method by which such agency may contract. Such contracts with other public agencies or private corporations or persons may contain such other and further covenants and agreements as may be necessary or convenient to accomplish the purposes thereof. The term “public agency,” as used in this paragraph, shall be deemed to mean and include the United States or any department or agency thereof, the State of California or any department or agency thereof, a county, city, public corporation, the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California, or public district of this state. The term “private corporation,” as used in this paragraph, shall be deemed to mean and include any private corporation organized under the laws of the United States or of this or any other state thereof. Contracts mentioned herein include those made with the United States, under the Federal Reclamation Act of June 17, 1902, and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto or any other act of Congress heretofore or hereafter enacted permitting cooperation. Any such contract with the United States or any department or agency thereof, or with any private corporation organized under the laws of the United States, by which the Antelope Valley-East Kern Water Agency incurs an indebtedness or liability exceeding in any year the income and revenue for such year shall not be executed without the assent of two-thirds of the qualified electors of the agency voting at a special election to be held for that purpose, such election to be called and held, so far as practicable, in the same manner as bond elections for the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21482.

In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the agency shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, second Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 114. Kern County Water Agency [21490. - 21492.]

21490.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Kern County Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 1003 of the Statutes of 1961.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21491.

(a) All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit, or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the agency, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work. The call for bids shall state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided into parts. The
 work may be let under a single contract or several contracts, as stated in such call. The board shall require the successful bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any bid.

(b) In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The agency may purchase in the open market without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work, either under contract or by force account; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 92.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

21492.

In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 115. Desert Water Agency [21500. - 21501.]

21500.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Desert Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 1069 of the Statutes of 1961.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21501.

(a) All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit, or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the agency, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work. The call for bids shall state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided into parts.
 The work may be let under a single contract or several contracts, as stated in such call. The board shall require the successful bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9550) of Title 3 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any and all bids.

(b) The board may have work done by force account without advertising for bids or by informal bidding procedures in any of the following situations:

(1) All proposals are rejected.

(2) No proposals are received.

(3) The estimated cost of the work does not exceed
 fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) until January 1, 1989. After January 1, 1989, the estimated cost of the work shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(4) The work consists of channel protection.

(5) The work consists of maintenance work, except that informal bidding procedures may be used only where the estimated cost does not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(6) The work consists of emergency work. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The agency may purchase in the open market without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work, either under contract or by force account, except that,
 materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased, if the cost exceeds fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(d) As used in this section, “informal bidding procedures” means that the board shall, at a minimum, award a contract to the lowest responsible bidder after publishing a notice which generally describes the work to be performed and invites written bids in a newspaper of general circulation in the agency once a week for two successive weeks. The board shall obtain a minimum of three written bids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 93.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 116. San Gorgonio Pass Water Agency [21510. - 21511.]

21510.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the San Gorgonio Pass Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 1435 of the Statutes of 1961.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21511.

(a) All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the agency, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work. The call for bids shall state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided into parts. The
 work may be let under a single contract or several contracts, as stated in the call. The board shall require the successful bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any and all bids.

(b) In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The agency may purchase in the open market without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work, either under contract or by force account. However, materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased, if the cost exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 94.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 117. Alpine County Water Agency [21520. - 21521.]

21520.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Alpine County Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 1896 of the Statutes of 1961.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21521.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit, or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the agency, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work. The call for bids shall state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided into parts. The work may be let under a
 single contract or several contracts, as stated in the call. The board shall require the successful bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any bid. In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). In that event a majority vote of all board members shall be required. The board may purchase in the open market
 without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work, either under contract or by force account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 95.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 118. Castaic Lake Water Agency [21530. - 21531.]

21530.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Santa Clarita Valley Water Agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 833, Sec. 2.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

21531.

(a) The Santa Clarita Valley Water Agency shall have power to prescribe methods for the construction of works and for the letting of contracts for the construction of works, structures, or equipment, or the performance or furnishing of labor, materials, or supplies, necessary or convenient for carrying out any of the purposes of this act or for the acquisition or disposal of any real or personal property; provided, that all contracts for any improvement or unit of work, when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed thirty thousand dollars
 ($30,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation published in the agency or by two insertions in a nondaily newspaper of general circulation published in the agency or, if no newspaper is published in the agency, in any newspaper of general circulation distributed in the agency, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work. The call for bids shall state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided into parts. The work may be let under a single contract or several contracts, as stated in the call. The board shall require the successful bidders to
 file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any bid.

(b) In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed
 thirty thousand dollars ($30,000),
 or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The agency may purchase in the open market without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work, either under contract or by force account; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds thirty
 thousand dollars ($30,000), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 833, Sec. 3.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 119. Crestline-Lake Arrowhead Water Agency [21540. - 21541.]

21540.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Crestline-Lake Arrowhead Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 40 of the Statutes of the 1962 First Extraordinary Session.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21541.

(a) The Crestline-Lake Arrowhead Water Agency shall have power to prescribe methods for the construction of works and for the letting of contracts for the construction of works, structures, or equipment, or the performance or furnishing of labor, materials, or supplies, necessary or convenient for carrying out any of the purposes of this act or for the acquisition or disposal of any real or personal property. However, all contracts for the construction of any improvement or unit of work, when the cost, according to the estimate of the engineer, will exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as
 a single unit or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the agency, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work. The call for bids shall state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided into parts. The work may be let under a single contract or several contracts, as stated in the call.

The board shall require the successful bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any bid.

(b) In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The agency may purchase in the open market without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work, either under contract or by force account. However, materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible
 bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 97.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 120. San Diego County Flood Control District [21550. - 21552.]

21550.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the San Diego County Flood Control District, as provided for in Chapter 55 of the Statutes of the 1966 First Extraordinary Session.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21551.

(a) All contracts for the construction of any unit of work estimated to cost over ten thousand dollars ($10,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in accordance with Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 20120) of Chapter 1.5. If cost of the project or service will not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the district may have the work done by force account. The district may purchase in the open market, without advertising for bid, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account. 

(b) The board of directors may, by ordinance, resolution, or board order, authorize the county engineer or other county officer to order changes or additions in work being performed under construction contract. When so authorized, any change or addition in the work shall be ordered in writing by the county engineer, or other designated officer, and the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) when the total amount of the original contract does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), nor 10 percent of the amount of any original contract that exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), but does not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). 

(c) For contracts whose original cost exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the extra cost for any change or addition to the work so ordered shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), plus 5 percent of the amount of the original contract costs in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000). In no event shall any such change or alteration exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 215, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

21552.

In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the district shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 121. Metropolitan Water District [21560. - 21567.]

21560.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by a Metropolitan Water District, as provided for in Chapter 209 of the Statutes of 1969.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21561.

As used in this article, “public corporation” means and includes the United States or any other public agency thereof or this or any other state or any political district or subdivision thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21562.

A district may join with one or more other public or private corporations (within or without this state) for the purpose of carrying out any of its powers, and for that purpose may contract with any such other public or private corporation to finance acquisitions, constructions, and operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21563.

Any contract with any other public or private corporation pursuant to Section 21562 may provide for contributions to be made by each party and for the division and apportionment of the expenses of such acquisitions and operations, and the division and apportionment of the benefits, services, and products from the contract. Any such contract may provide for an agency to effect such acquisitions and carry on such operations, and shall provide in the powers and methods of procedure for such agency the method by which such agency may contract. Any such contract may contain such other and further covenants and agreements as may be necessary and convenient to accomplish such purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21564.

The board may prescribe methods for the construction of works and for the letting of contracts for the construction of works, structures, or equipment, or for the performance or furnishing of labor, materials, or supplies required for the carrying out of any of the purposes of this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21565.

Except as otherwise provided in Article 121.1 (commencing with Section 21568) of this chapter, whenever any work is not to be done by the district itself by force account, and the amount involved shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more, the board shall provide for the letting of contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, after publication of notices inviting bids, but subject to the right of the board to reject any and all proposals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 275, Sec. 1.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21566.

The board, in advertising for bids and in letting contracts as provided in Section 21565, may require that all articles furnished to the district pursuant to such contracts be manufactured, produced, or fabricated in the United States or its territories, and may prohibit the use in, or employment in connection with, the carrying out of such contracts by the contractor or any subcontractor, of all machinery or materials except those which have been manufactured, produced, or fabricated in the United States or its territories, if they are determined by the board to be available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21567.

(a) Notwithstanding the requirements of Section 21566, contracts, in writing or otherwise, may be let without advertising for, or inviting bids, when any repairs, alterations, or other work, or the purchase of materials, supplies, equipment, or other property is deemed by the board to be for an emergency.

(b) In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, Sec. 76.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 121.1. Metropolitan Water District of Southern California-Alternative Project Delivery Program [21568. - 21568.11.]

21568.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that severe drought conditions and climate change have negatively impacted the imported water supplies of the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California, necessitating an increase in local water supplies, including recycled water, and the construction of water infrastructure to more efficiently transport limited water supplies within the district’s service area.

(b) The
 Legislature further finds and declares that alternative project delivery, using the best value procurement methodology, has been authorized for various agencies that have reported benefits from those projects not achievable through the traditional design-bid-build method, including reduced project costs and expedited project start and completion.

(c) This article provides for a range of procurement methods for district projects, including a planned regional recycled water project, designed to counteract the negative impacts of severe and ongoing drought and the continuing impacts of climate change on water supplies in southern California.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to authorize the district to utilize the methods specified herein as cost-effective options for accelerating the construction of drought-resilient water infrastructure
 projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21568.1.

(a) Upon approval by its governing body, the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California may use, in addition to other methods of project delivery otherwise allowable by law, the following methods of project delivery for a regional recycled water project or other water infrastructure project undertaken by the district to alleviate water supply shortages attributable to drought or climate change:

(1) Design-build.

(2) Progressive design-build.

(3) Construction Manager/General Contractor method.

(b) (1) A design-build contract shall be awarded pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22160).

(2) A progressive design-build contract or a Construction Manager/General Contractor method contract shall be awarded on a best value or qualifications basis or to the lowest responsible bidder.

(c) The authority under this article shall apply to no more than 15 capital outlay projects.

(d) The district shall develop guidelines for a standard organizational conflict-of-interest policy,
 consistent with applicable law, regarding the ability of a person or entity that performs services for the district relating to the solicitation of a design-build or progressive design-build project to submit a proposal as a design-build entity, or to join a design-build team.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21568.2.

As used in this article:

(a) “Best value” means a value determined by evaluation of objective criteria that relate to price, features, functions, life-cycle costs, experience, and past performance. A best value determination may involve the selection of the lowest cost proposal meeting the interests of the district and meeting the objectives of the project.

(b) “Construction
 manager” means a partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that is a licensed contractor pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code and that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting and engineering services as needed pursuant to a Construction Manager/General Contractor method contract.

(c) “Construction Manager/General Contractor method” means a project delivery method in which a construction manager is procured to provide preconstruction services during the design phase of the project and construction services during the construction phase of the project. The contract for construction services may be entered into at the same time as the contract for preconstruction services or at a later time. The execution of the design and the construction of the project may be in sequential phases or concurrent phases.

(d) “Design-build” means a project delivery process in which both the design and construction of a project are procured from a single entity.

(e) “Design-build entity” means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting, architectural, and engineering services as needed pursuant to a design-build contract.

(f) “District” means the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California.

(g) “Guaranteed maximum price” means the maximum payment amount agreed upon by the district and the design-build entity or the Construction Manager/General Contractor for the design-build entity or the Construction Manager/General Contractor to finish all remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities
 sufficient to complete and close out the project.

(h) “Preconstruction services” means advice during the design phase, including, but not limited to, scheduling, pricing, and phasing to assist the district to design a more constructible project.

(i) “Progressive design-build” means a project delivery process in which both the design and construction of a project are procured from a single design-build entity that is selected through a qualifications-based selection at the earliest feasible stage of the project.

(j) “Project” means a public work necessary for the construction of a recycled water facility or infrastructure designed specifically to alleviate water shortages attributable to drought, climate change, or other environmental factors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21568.3.

(a) The district shall follow the design-build procedure described in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22160) to award a design-build contract pursuant to this article.

(b) For purposes of this section, all references in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 22160) to “county” and “local agency” shall mean the district, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 21568.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 275, Sec. 2.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21568.4.

The procurement process for progressive design-build projects shall proceed as follows:

(a) The district shall prepare and issue a request for qualifications in order to select a design-build entity to execute the project. The request for qualifications shall include, but need not be limited to, the following elements:

(1) Documentation of the size, type, and desired design
 character of the project and any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the district’s needs, including the expected cost range, the methodology that will be used by the district to evaluate the design-build entity’s qualifications, the procedure for final selection of the design-build entity, and any other information deemed necessary by the district to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(2) Significant factors that the district reasonably expects to consider in evaluating qualifications, including technical design and construction expertise, and all other non-price-related factors. The district may require that a preliminary cost estimate, including the basis for the estimate, be included in the design-build entities’ responses and may consider those costs in evaluation of the statements of qualifications.

(3) The relative importance or
 the weight assigned to each of the factors identified in the request for qualifications.

(4) A request for statements of qualifications with a template for the statement that is prepared by the district. The district shall require all of the following information in the statement and indicate, in the template, that the following information is required:

(A) If the design-build entity is a privately held corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or joint venture, a listing of all of the entity’s shareholders, partners, or members known at the time of the statement of qualification submission who will perform work on the project.

(B) Evidence that the members of the design-build team have completed, or have demonstrated the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete projects of similar
 size, scope, or complexity, and that proposed personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage and complete the design and construction of the project, and a financial statement that ensures that the design-build entity has the capacity to complete the project.

(C) The licenses, registration, and credentials required to design and construct the project, including, but not limited to, information on the revocation or suspension of any license, credential, or registration.

(D) Evidence that establishes that the design-build entity has the capacity to obtain all required payment and performance bonding, liability insurance, and errors and omissions insurance.

(E) Information concerning workers’ compensation experience history and a worker safety program.

(F) If the proposed design-build entity is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity, a copy of the organizational documents or agreement committing to form the organization.

(G) An acceptable safety record. A proposer’s safety record shall be deemed acceptable if its experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period is an average of 1.00 or less, and its average total recordable injury or illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period does not exceed the applicable statistical standards for its business category or if the proposer is a party to an alternative dispute resolution system as provided for in Section 3201.5 of the Labor Code.

(5) The information required under this subdivision shall be certified under penalty of
 perjury by the design-build entity and its general partners or joint venture members.

(b) At the close of the solicitation period, the district shall review the submissions. The district may evaluate submissions based solely upon the information provided in each design-build entity’s statement of qualifications. The district may also interview some or all of the design-build entities to further evaluate their qualifications for the project.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, upon issuance of a contract award, the district shall publicly announce its award, identifying the design-build entity to which the award is made, along with a statement regarding the basis of the award. The statement regarding the district’s contract award and the contract file shall provide sufficient information to satisfy an external audit.

(d) After selecting a design-build entity based on qualifications, the district may enter into a contract and direct the design-build entity to begin design and preconstruction activities sufficient to establish a guaranteed maximum price for the project.

(e) (1) Upon agreement of the guaranteed maximum price for the project, the district, at its sole and absolute discretion, may amend its contract with the design-build entity to contract for the remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the project, and will amend the contract to be consistent with the guaranteed maximum price. In the event that there are unforeseen site conditions or changes initiated at the request of the district, the guaranteed maximum price shall be modified if necessary.
